Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-732
Governor or Attorney General; duty to implement laws; violation; penalty.

The knowing failure or refusal of either the Governor or Attorney General to perform the duties imposed upon them by section 84-731 shall constitute a misdemeanor in office within the meaning of section 5 of Article IV of the Constitution of Nebraska and render the offender liable to a fine of one hundred dollars and to impeachment.

Laws 1978, LB 98, § 2.